Massachusetts, session 194th, H120.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6C of chapter 20 of the General Laws is amended by inserting the following
subsection:-
(h) The council shall appoint a full time food system coordinator as an employee. The
food system coordinator shall have access to all relevant agency meetings; serve in an advisory
capacity to all relevant departments to inventory existing state programs which relate to the food
system across all state agencies, including, but not limited to, agencies associated with the
council; facilitate communication and resource collaboration across state agencies; develop and
track metrics related to food system goals; identify opportunities to eliminate duplicative efforts
and strengthen complementary programs and projects; identify gaps in services and supports and
of 2

make recommendations; and provide input to help coordinate outreach to underserved
communities. The food system coordinator shall submit a report 1 week prior to each council
meeting with findings, progress updates, and recommendations to the clerks of the senate and the
house of representatives, the council, relevant department secretaries, and relevant department
commissioners.
of 2